Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB928.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 7 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Special Committee on Sexual Misconduct is hereby established as an
independent authority and shall be attached to the Legislative Research
Commission for administrative purposes only.
(2) The committee shall be composed of the following eight (8) members:
(a) Three (3) members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(b) One (1) member of the Senate, appointed by the Minority Floor Leader of
the Senate;
(c) Three (3) members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
(d) One (1) member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Minority
Floor Leader of the House of Representatives.
(3) The committee shall:
(a) Receive and investigate complaints submitted by an employee of the
Legislative Research Commission or a member of the public alleging that a
member of the General Assembly has committed sexual harassment, sexual
abuse, or sexual assault against:
1. An employee of the Legislative Research Commission;
2. Another member of the General Assembly; or
3. A member of the public;
(b) Upon completion of its investigation, but no later than ninety (90) days after
receipt of a complaint submitted in accordance with paragraph (a) of this
subsection, submit a report of its findings and any recommended punitive
actions to be taken, if any, to the:
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2425
1. President of the Senate and all members of the Senate, if the alleged
violator is a member of the Senate; or
2. Speaker of the House of Representatives and all members of the
House of Representatives, if the alleged violator is a member of the
House of Representatives;
(c) Conduct a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B if, upon
completion of its investigation, the committee finds that the member of the
General Assembly may have committed sexual harassment, sexual abuse, or
sexual assault alleged in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(d) Recommend punitive actions, if after the hearing the committee finds that a
member of the General Assembly has committed a violation. The committee
shall recommend to the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, as appropriate, punitive actions which may include but
not be limited to:
1. Removal from committees to which the member of the General
Assembly has been assigned;
2. Denial of access to employees of the Legislative Research Commission
affected by the conduct;
3. Denial of access to certain parts of the New State Capitol, New Capitol
Annex, or any temporary buildings in use by the General Assembly;
4. Imposition of fines;
5. Initiation of a vote of the applicable body for expulsion of the
member; or
6. Any other penalty the committee deems appropriate.
(4) The complaint and any records resulting from the investigation under this section
shall be exempt from the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(5) Any records that identify the complainant or a witness shall be confidential and
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2425
redacted from any final reports. Personally identifiable information pertaining to
the complainant or any witnesses shall be exempt from the Open Records Act,
KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed